lexc-files/inflections/verb/verb-infl_te.txt
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^ken    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Pl]:^%{.at.%}la^msi   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Du]:^%{.at.%}la^mtek   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^ken    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Pl]:^%{.at.%}la^msi   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Du]:^%{.at.%}la^mtek   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^ken    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Pl]:^%{.at.%}la^msi   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Du]:^%{.at.%}la^mtek   Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[2--.2--] forms                                                                                                                                          |
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! negative present optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Intr]:^fqaa  IntrOptNEG;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns]:^fqaa  TrnsOptNEG;

!--------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Pl]:^fqiita Enclitic;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Pl.3Pl]:^fqiita Enclitic;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Du.3Pl]:^fqiita Enclitic;
!--------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! future optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Fut.Intr]:^%{.at.%}lgha  IntrOptFut;
^[Opt.Fut.Trns]:^%{.at.%}nake  TrnsOptFut;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! negative future optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Neg.Fut.Intr]:^%{.at.%}yaquna  IntrOptFutNEG;
^[Opt.Neg.Fut.Trns]:^%{.at.%}yaquna  TrnsOptFutNEG;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! participial-oblique 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[PtcpObl.Intr]:^%{.at.%}yalghii IntrPtcpObl;
^[PtcpObl.Trns]:^%{.at.%}yaqe    TrnsPtcpObl; 

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! precessive 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Prec.Intr]:^%{.at.%}vagilga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Prec.Trns]:^%{.at.%}vagilga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! concessive 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Conc.Intr]:^ghnga  IntrConc;
^[Conc.Trns]:^ghnga  TrnsConc;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! consequential I
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cnsq1.Intr]:^%{.at.%}ya  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Trns]:^%{.at.%}ya  TrnsPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Intr]:^%{.f.%}nga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Trns]:^%{.f.%}nga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! consequential II
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cnsq2.Intr]:^%{.f.%}aqnga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq2.Trns]:^%{.f.%}aqnga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! conditional
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cond.Intr]:^%{.at.%}k  IntrCond;
^[Cond.Trns]:^%{.at.%}k  TrnsCond;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! contemporative 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ctmp.Intr]:^%{.at.%}negh  IntrCtmp;
^[Ctmp.Trns]:^%{.at.%}negh  TrnsCtmp; 
^[Ctmp.Intr]:^%{.at.%}ngh   IntrCtmp; ! sometimes -e is absent, idk why
^[Ctmp.Trns]:^%{.at.%}ngh   TrnsCtmp; ! e.g. amsanaanghani ^['Sivuqam Kiyaghtaallgha Ayumiq' from Lore Vol1]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! subordinative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Sbrd.Intr]:^%{.at.%}lu   IntrSubr;
^[Sbrd.Trns]:^%{.at.%}lu   TrnsSubr; 
^[Sbrd.Intr]:^%{.at.%}llu  IntrSubr; ! sometimes -l is devoiced, idk why
^[Sbrd.Trns]:^%{.at.%}llu  TrnsSubr; ! e.g. kayusiisqellunga ^[Jacobson (2001) p.101]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! volitive of fear
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Volitive.Of.Fear]:^nayuka VolitiveOfFear;
